Hawaii statutes.
[§371-21] K-12 agriculture workforce
development pipeline initiative. (a) There shall be created in the
department a k‑12 agriculture workforce development pipeline initiative
to conduct training sessions for teachers and school administrators on the islands
of Oahu, Hawaii, Maui, Molokai, Lanai, and Kauai, regarding agricultural
self-sufficiency.

(b) The k-12 agriculture workforce development
pipeline initiative shall be headed by a coordinator who shall be appointed by
the director, subject to chapter 76, to carry out the purposes of this section,
which may include developing and proposing scholarships, travel offsets, course
credits, and stipends. The coordinator may hire, subject to chapter 76,
necessary staff, including a workforce development specialist, to carry out the
purposes of this section.

(c) Course material for the training sessions
under subsection (a) shall be approved by the Hawaii agriculture workforce
advisory board established pursuant to section 371-19.

(d) The department shall submit annual reports
to the legislature on the activities of the k-12 agriculture workforce
development pipeline initiative. [L 2016, c 229, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next